Hawaii statutes.
§134-13 Revocation of permits. All
permits and licenses provided for under this part may be revoked, for good
cause, by the issuing authority or by the judge of any court. [L 1988, c 275,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next